Udmurt.aff
SFX k 0 осад [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осады [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осаз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осазы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсам [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсамы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсад [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсады [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсаз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсазы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # входн.п.
SFX k 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # исходн.п.
SFX k 0 осысь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсысь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысьтым [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX k 0 ъёсысьтымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысьтыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысьтыды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысьтыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысьтызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осысьтым [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысьтымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысьтыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысьтыды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысьтыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысьтызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсысьтым [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысьтымы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысьтыд [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысьтыды [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысьтыз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысьтызы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысен [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # отдал.п.
SFX k 0 осысен [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсысен [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысеным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX k 0 ъёсысенымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысеныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысеныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысеныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсысенызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осысеным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысенымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысеныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысеныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысеныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осысенызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсысеным [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысенымы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысеныд [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысеныды [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысеныз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсысенызы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсэтӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # перех.п.
SFX k 0 ъёстӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осэтӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсэтӥ [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстӥ [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстӥм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX k 0 ъёстӥмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстӥд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстӥды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстӥз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстӥзы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 остӥм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остӥмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остӥд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остӥды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остӥз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остӥзы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёстӥм [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстӥмы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстӥд [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстӥды [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстӥз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстӥзы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёслань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # направ.п.
SFX k 0 ослань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёслань [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыдлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсызлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыдлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осызлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсылань [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыдлань [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсызлань [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмылань [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстылань [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссылань [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # предельн.п.
SFX k 0 осозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсозь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсыдозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсызозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсмыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёстыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёссыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсозям [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсозямы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсозяд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсозяды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсозяз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 ъёсозязы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX k 0 осыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осыдозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осызозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осмыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 остыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 оссыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осозям [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осозямы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осозяд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осозяды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осозяз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 осозязы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX k 0 ёсыозь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсыдозь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсызозь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсмыозь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёстыозь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёссыозь [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсозям [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсозямы [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсозяд [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсозяды [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсозяз [ьъй]
SFX k 0 ёсозязы [ьъй]

SFX q Y 73 # числительные
SFX q 0 0 .
SFX q 0 зэ .
SFX q 0 ез [^дзлнст]
SFX q 0 эз [дзлнст]
SFX q ь ез ь
SFX q ь яз ь
SFX q 0 аз [^ь]
SFX q 0 лэн .
SFX q 0 лэсь .
SFX q 0 лы .
SFX q 0 тэк .
SFX q 0 ъя [^ь]
SFX q 0 я ь
SFX q 0 ен [^дзлнст]
SFX q 0 эн [дзлнст]
SFX q ь ен ь
SFX q 0 ын
SFX q 0 э [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 е [^дзлнсть]
SFX q ь е ь
SFX q 0 ысь .
SFX q 0 ысен .
SFX q 0 этӥ [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 етӥ [^дзлнсть]
SFX q ь етӥ ь
SFX q 0 лань 0
SFX q 0 озь [^ь]
SFX q 0 ёзь ь
SFX q 0 этӥез [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥзэ [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥлэн [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥлэсь [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥлы [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥтэк [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥя [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥен [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥын [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥе [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥысь [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥысен [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥетӥ [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥлань [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 этӥозь [дзлнст]
SFX q 0 етӥез [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥзэ [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥлэн [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥлэсь [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥлы [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥтэк [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥя [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥен [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥын [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥе [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥысь [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥысен [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥетӥ [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥлань [^дзлнсть]
SFX q 0 етӥозь [^дзлнсть]
SFX q ь етӥез ь
SFX q ь етӥзэ ь
SFX q ь етӥлэн ь
SFX q ь етӥлэсь ь
SFX q ь етӥлы ь
SFX q ь етӥтэк ь
SFX q ь етӥя ь
SFX q ь етӥен ь
SFX q ь етӥын ь
SFX q ь етӥе ь
SFX q ь етӥысь ь
SFX q ь етӥысен ь
SFX q ь етӥетӥ ь
SFX q ь етӥлань ь
SFX q ь етӥозь ь

SFX p Y 29 # прилагательные
SFX p 0 о [^ьй]
SFX p ь ё ь
SFX p й ё й
SFX p 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX p 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX p 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX p 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX p 0 ез [^дзлнстьй]
SFX p 0 эз [дзлнст]
SFX p ь ез ь
SFX p й ез й
SFX p 0 алэс [^ь]
SFX p ь ялэс [ь]
SFX p 0 есь [^дзлнстьй]
SFX p 0 эсь [дзлнст]
SFX p ь есь ь
SFX p й есь й
SFX p 0 есьёсыз [^дзлнстьй]
SFX p 0 эсьёсыз [дзлнсть]
SFX p ь есьёсыз ь
SFX p й есьёсыз й
SFX p 0 есьгес [^дзлнсть]
SFX p 0 эсьгес [дзлнсть]
SFX p ь есьгес ь
SFX p й есьгес й
SFX p 0 гес .
SFX p 0 мыт .
SFX p 0 пыр .
SFX p 0 пыръем .
