Udmurt.dic
австрийской/p
авторитето/p
агентурной/p
агротехнической/p
адресной/p
азвесь/dp
азинлыко/p
азьвыла/p
азьло/p
айо/p
акаяшка/dp
активной/p
акыр/p
алдэ-юлдэ/p
алышной/p
амалтэмгес/p
анайтэм/p
андано/p
антифашистской/p
аракыё/p
арӟа/p
арлыдъем/p
артык/pd
арыкман/dp
аспӧртэм/p
асярбак/p
аулак/p
бабылё/p
бадӟынэз/p
байгыш/dp
баки/p
балкар/dp
банан/dp
баскич-баскич/p
башлы/p
бездарной/p
бекмылес/p
бельгийской/p
беризесь/p
берло-валлё/p
бесклассовой/p
бесхозяйственной/p
биллион/q
бильярдной/p
благородной/p
бозгес/p
бороздаё/p
бӧсыро/p
бронетанковой/p
будонтэм/p
бун/dp
бурлы/p
бускылё/p
бушкыр/dp
быдыр/pd
бык/dp
бюджетной/p
вазер/dp
вакыттэм/p
валлян/p
вамат/p
ванё-ӧвӧло/p
вашкала/p
великодержавной/p
верем/p
веськырес/p
визьмо/p
вимо/p
вирсэрес/p
вистэм/p
витен-витен/q
витетӥ/q
витетӥез/q
вить/q
витьдас/q
вить-куать/q
витьмос/q
витьнады/q
витьназы/q
витьнамы/q
витьтон/q
витьтонэтӥ/q
властьтэм/p
внутрисоюзной/p
вогыриё-вогыриё/p
вожалэс/p
воздушной/p
возьыттэм/p
вольной/p
ворино/p
ворпоё/p
восьмой/q
вӧесь/p
вӧлмыт/p
всенародной/p
вужересь/p
вукылэс/p
вуэсь/p
вылӥ-вылӥ/p
выно/p
выходной/dp
гаиб/p
гарваз/p
генеральской/p
геоцентрической/p
герӟет/dp
гигантской/p
гижлоё/p
гимнастической/p
голёкан/dp
гольыш/dp
гонэсь/p
гордгалэс/p
горной/p
готыр/dp
граммофонной/p
грифельной/p
губрес/p
гуманной/p
гурезесь/p
гурыё/p
гылыт/p
гырлыё/p
дарали/dp
дас/q
дас-кызь/q
дасмос/q
даснады/q
дасназы/q
даснамы/q
дасо/q
дасо-кызё/q
даспуй/q
дасэн/q
дасэн-дасэн/q
дасэтӥ/q
дасэтӥез/q
датчан/dp
дежурной/dp
депутат/dp
диссертационной/p
добровольной/p
долыго/p
доро/p
дуно/p
дусымо/p
дэдэрес/p
егитъем/p
ёзви/dp
жаг/dp
женьшень/dp
жӧл-жӧл/p
ӝег/p
ӝотрес/p
ӝушмет/p
задорлыко/p
западной/p
здоровой/p
зональной/p
зугрес/p
зэмутись/dp
ӟарыт-чагыр/p
ӟизег/dp
ӟугыри-ӟуг/p
из/dp
именительной/p
инок/p
искусственной/p
ичигес/p
йӧн/dp
йыло/p
йырполэс/p
кадырлыко/p
какырна/p
камерной/p
капитальной/p
караульной/dp
картинной/p
катё/p
квалифицированной/p
кельышлы/p
кенэм/dp
кескичлыко/p
кибернетической/p
кильтырес/p
кисыр/p
киямыс/q
киямыстас/q
клёш/dp
кокро/p
командировочной/pd
комо-комо/p
консервативной/p
коньыт/p
корт/dp
кӧбертэм/p
кӧсыт/p
краснознамённой/p
ку//dp
куамын/q
куамынэтӥ/q
куамынэтӥез/q
куаратэм/pd
куатен-куатен/q
куатетӥ/q
куатетӥез/q
куать/q
куатьмос/q
куатьнады/q
куатьназы/q
куатьнамы/q
куатьтон/q
куатьтонэтӥ/q
куатьтонэтӥез/q
куд-ог/p
кузтэм-палтэм/p
куинен-куинен/q
куинетӥ/q
куинетӥез/q
куинь/q
куиньметӥ/q
куиньметӥез/q
куиньмос/q
куиньнады/q
куиньназы/q
куиньнамы/q
куинь-ньыль/q
куйы/dp
культурной/p
кунго/p
курдэс/p
куроё-бодыё/p
кушето/p
кызетӥ/q
кызетӥез/q
кызё/q
кызь/q/dp
кык/q
кыкен/q
кыкен-кыкен/q
кыкетӥ/q
кыкетӥез/q
кык-куинь/q
кыкмос/q
кыкнады/q
кыкназы/q
кыкнамы/q
кыкполэс/p
кыксю/q
кыктос/dq
кыктэн/q
кыктэтӥ/q
кыктэтӥез/q
кыкъямыс/q
кыкъямыстон/q
кылчин/dp
кырен/p
кыӵе-сыӵе/p
ладлы/p
ланьтэм/p
лафетной/p
леконь/dp
лемлетпыръем-лыз/p
лётной/p
лирико-эпической/p
ломовой/p
луло/p
лушкем/p
лыз-пурысь/p
льготной/p
лэсянтэм/p
магистральной/p
макес/dp
мандарин/dp
марксистско-ленинской/p
матросской/p
межпланетной/p
мерлыко/p
меӵгес/p
миллион/q
минеральной/p
моглок/p
монгольской/p
мотоциклет/dp
мугоръем/p
мултэс/p
муссон/dp
мылкыдъем/p
мята/dp
напалмовой/p
народно-революционной/p
национально-государственной/p
неграмотной/p
непереходной/p
ниё-версо/p
ноголё/pd
нокудды/q
ноль/q
нордос/dp
нуналлы/p
нылпиё/p
нырысетӥ/q
нырысетӥез/q
ньӧресь/p
ньылетӥ/q
ньылетӥез/q
ньылё/q
ньыль/q
ньыль-вить/q
ньыльвыртно/qp
ньыльдас/q
ньыльдон/q
ньыльдонэтӥ/q
ньыльмос/q
ньыльнады/q
ньыльназы/q
ньыльнамы/q
ньыльсю/q
нюлэмесь/p
нялтас/p
обинь/dp
общеевропейской/p
общой/p
ог/q
огдылы-огды/q
огды-огды/q
огез-но/q
оген/q
оген-кыкен/q
оген-оген/q
огзӧкта/p
огзы/q
огзы-огзы/q
ог-кык/q
огнад/q
огнады/q
огназы/q
огнам/q
огнамы/q
ог-огды/q
ог-огзы/q
ого-кыкто/q
огпасьта/qp
огпасьтана/p
одӥг/q
одӥгез/q
одӥген/q
одӥген-кыкен/q
одӥген-одӥген/q
одӥгетӥ/q
одӥгетӥез/q
одӥг-кык/q
одӥгнад/q
одӥгназ/q
одӥгнам/q
одӥго/q
одӥг-одӥг/q
одӥгысь-одӥг/q
ож/dp
омонимической/p
оптовой/p
оркестровой/p
ответственной/p
офицерской/p
ӧро/p
пайдатэм/p
палчи/p
парафин/dp
пасесь/p
пачкес/p
пельтэм-кылтэм/p
первоез/q
переговорной/p
персидской/p
пиё-пиё/p
пиньтэм/p
питрес/p
плис/dp
подоходной/p
позывной/p
полицейской/p
породистой/p
потомственной/p
пӧртэмлыко/p
предложной/p
придаточной/p
пришкольной/p
производительной/p
противовоздушной/p
психической/p
пулемётной/p
пур-пур/p
пуштросъем/p
пыдэстэм/p
пырчоо-пырчоо/p
радиолокационной/p
раненой/dp
регулярной/p
репетиционной/p
родняё/p
русской/p
сазан/dp
самодержавной/p
сапожной/p
сварочной/p
сельскохозяйственной/p
сигнальной/p
сизьым/q
сизьымдас/q
сизьымдон/q
сизьымдонэтӥ/q
сизьымдонэтӥез/q
сизьыметӥ/q
сизьыметӥез/q
сизьыммос/q
сизьымо/pq
синмо-пелё/p
сирсо/p
сӥялэс/p
слизистой/p
собственной/p
сочинительной/p
стабильной/p
струнной/p
сукмак/p
суро-пурто/p
сьӧдо/p
сьӧртэм/p
сю/q
сюлмо/p
сюмос/q
сюрс/q
сюрсмос/q
сюрсо/q
сюрсэн-сюрсэн/q
сюрсэтӥ/q
сюрсэтӥез/q
сюэн/q
сюэн-сюрсэн/q
сюэтӥ/q
сюэтӥез/q
сямо/p
талантливой/p
ташкес/p
термической/p
тирикай/dp
толковой/p
топкес/p
тӧдьыгем/p
тӧри/p
триллион/q
трос/q
троюродной/p
тульк/pd
туристической/p
тушесь/p
тыпыесь/p
тыръем/p
тэскары/p
тямыс/q
тямыснады/q
тямысназы/q
тямыснамы/q
тямысо/q
тямыстон/q
тямыстонэтӥ/q
тямыстонэтӥез/q
тямысэтӥ/q
тямысэтӥез/q
удмурт-ӟуч/p
узыр/pd
уик/q
укмыс/q
укмысдас/q
укмыснады/q
укмысназы/q
укмыснамы/q
укмысо/q
укмыстон/q
укмыстонэтӥ/q
укмыстонэтӥез/q
укмысэтӥ/q
уктантэм/p
ултэм/p
умой-умой/p
уно/q
уродос/p
уӵы/dp
фарфоровой/p
фигурной/p
финн/dp
форменной/p
футбольной/p
хищной/p
хромовой/p
цеховой/p
чай/dp
чарпут/p
червонной/p
чех/dp
чилепо/p
чозырес/p
чуко/p
чылк-чылк/p
ӵогрес/p
ӵужо-вожо/p
ӵыж-горд/p
шакмато/p
шарагат/p
шельф/dp
шобыр/p
шорчиньы/dp
штатской/p
шукыесь/p
шуныт/pd
шыпык/p
ыльысо/p
ышык/dp
эзгиё/p
экспортной/p
элементной/p
энгек/dp
эскимос/dp
этюдной/p
южной/p
юной/p
явор/dp
ялан/p
янтарь/dp
ят/p
